Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB240.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2 of the act of May 26, 2017 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Pennsylvania REAL ID Compliance Act, is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Senior citizen." An individual who is at least 65 years of age.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:1234567891011121314151617181920 Section 3.1. Related fees.(a) Exemption.--An eligible applicant who is also a senior citizen shall be exempt from all fees related to the administration of this act and shall only be required to pay the costs of a standard-issued driver's license or photo identification card.(b) Fees.--The department shall establish reasonable and appropriate fees in order to administer this section.Section 3. Any regulations inconsistent with this act are abrogated to the extent of any inconsistency with this act.Section 4. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0240PN0467 - 2 - 1234567891011